Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-507
Applicability of act.

The Trade Secrets Act shall not apply to any misappropriation occurring prior to July 9, 1988. With respect to a continuing misappropriation that began prior to July 9, 1988, such act also shall not apply to the continuing misappropriation that occurs after such date.

Laws 1988, LB 337A, § 7.

Although Nebraska’s Trade Secrets Act is based on the Uniform Trade Secrets Act, Nebraska’s definition of a trade secret differs significantly from the uniform act. If an alleged trade secret is ascertainable at all by any means that are not “improper,” the would be secret is peremptorily excluded from coverage under Nebraska’s act. First Express Servs. Group v. Easter, 286 Neb. 912, 840 N.W.2d 465 (2013).